test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-millo_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: miḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: miḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miiḷon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miḷottáá
    millo+N+Ess: millon
    millo+N+Par: millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miḷoh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miḷoi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miḷoiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miḷoittáá
